Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5271.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 45-21-24 of the General Laws in Chapter 45-21 entitled "Retirement
of Municipal Employees" is hereby amended to read as follows:
45-21-24. Adjustment of disability allowances on return to work — Discontinuance
for refusal to submit to examination.
(a) Should the beneficiary be engaged in a gainful occupation or should the beneficiary be
offered service as a result of the placing of his or her name on a list of candidates, the retirement
board shall adjust, and from time to time readjust, the amount of his or her disability allowance to
an amount which, when added to the amount of compensation then earnable by the beneficiary,
shall not exceed the rate of earnable compensation currently in force for the classification that the
disability annuitant held prior to retirement. Beneficiaries that retire under the provisions of chapter
21.2 of title 45, shall be entitled to earn an amount that, when added to the amount of compensation
then earnable by the beneficiary, shall not exceed five (5) times the rate of earnable compensation
currently in force for the classification that the disability annuitant held prior to retirement.
(b) Should any disability annuitant under the minimum age of retirement refuse to submit
to a medical examination in any year by a physician or physicians designated by the retirement
board, the annuitant’s retirement allowance may be discontinued until the annuitant’s withdrawal
of the refusal, and should the annuitant’s refusal continue for one year after a request has been
made, all the annuitant’s rights in and to the retirement allowance may be revoked by the retirement
board. A disability annuitant, reinstated to active service, shall be reinstated as a member and

participate in the benefits of the retirement system to the same extent as any other member.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000812
========
LC000812 - Page 2 of 3